District of Columbia statutes.
50-1731.06

Enforcement; fines and penalties.

(a)

The penalty for violating §§ 50-1731.03, 50-1731.04, or 50-1731.05 shall be a fine of $100; provided, that the fine shall be suspended for a first time violator who, subsequent to the violation but prior to the imposition of a fine, provides proof of acquisition of a hands-free accessory of the type required by this chapter. The suspension shall not apply to violations related to texting.

(b)

A violation of the provisions of §§ 50-1731.03, 50-1731.04, or 50-1731.05 shall be processed and adjudicated under the provisions applicable to moving violations set forth in subchapter II of Chapter 23 of this title; provided, that no points shall be assessed for a violation of this chapter that does not contribute to an accident.

History

Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-124, § 6, 51 DCR 1541
Apr. 8, 2005, D.C. Law 15-304, § 2, 52 DCR 1694
Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 227(b), 56 DCR 7413

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-1731.03.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-304 rewrote subsec. (b) which had read:
“(b) A violation of the provisions of § 50-1731.03, 50-1731.04 or 50-1731.05 shall be processed and adjudicated under the provisions applicable to moving violations set forth in subchapter II of Chapter 23 of this title.”
D.C. Law 18-88, in subsec. (a), inserted “The suspension shall not apply to violations related to texting.”

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Distracted Driving Safety Revised Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-232, March 16, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 3558).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Distracted Driving Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-464, June 23, 2004, 51 DCR 6756).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Distracted Driving Safety Revised Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-500, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8812).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Distracted Driving Safety Revised Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-616, November 30, 2004, 51 DCR 11444).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Distracted Driving Safety Revised Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-16, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2958).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 227(b) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 227(b) of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).